Arkansas, session 2025, HB1500.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The income tax apportionment throwback rule causes the
Arkansas income tax to unduly burden job creation and investment in the
state, thus harming economic competitiveness, especially in comparison to
states that do not have a throwback rule or that do not impose an income tax;
and
(2) The Arkansas Tax Reform and Relief Legislative Task Force
recommended repeal of the throwback rule.
(b) The General Assembly intends to repeal the throwback rule to
encourage investment and job creation in Arkansas by multistate enterprises.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-5-101, Article IV, paragraph 16,
concerning the division of income under the Multistate Tax Compact, is
amended to read as follows:
16. Sales of tangible personal property are in this
*JLL218*
02/17/2025 11:48:27 AM JLL218

HB1500
state if:
(a) The the property is delivered or shipped to a
purchaser within this state regardless of the f.o.b. point or other
conditions of the sale; or
(b) The property is shipped from an office, store,
warehouse, factory, or other place of storage in this state and the taxpayer
is not taxable in the state of the purchaser, in which case the sales shall
be sourced as follows:
(1) For the tax year beginning on January 1,
2024, sales shall be sourced eighty-five and seventy-one hundredths percent
(85.71%) within this state and fourteen and twenty-nine hundredths percent
(14.29%) outside this state;
(2) For the tax year beginning on January 1,
2025, sales shall be sourced seventy-one and forty-two hundredths percent
(71.42%) within this state and twenty-eight and fifty-eight hundredths
percent (28.58%) outside this state;
(3) For the tax year beginning on January 1,
2026, sales shall be sourced fifty-seven and thirteen hundredths percent
(57.13%) within this state and forty-two and eighty-seven hundredths percent
(42.87%) outside this state;
(4) For the tax year beginning on January 1,
2027, sales shall be sourced forty-two and eighty-four hundredths percent
(42.84%) within this state and fifty-seven and sixteen hundredths percent
(57.16%) outside this state;
(5) For the tax year beginning on January 1,
2028, sales shall be sourced twenty-eight and fifty-five hundredths percent
(28.55%) within this state and seventy-one and forty-five hundredths percent
(71.45%) outside this state;
(6) For the tax year beginning on January 1,
2029, sales shall be sourced fourteen and twenty-six hundredths percent
(14.26%) within this state and eighty-five and seventy-four hundredths
percent (85.74%) outside this state; and
(7) For tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2030, sales shall be sourced one hundred percent (100%) outside
this state.

02/17/2025 11:48:27 AM JLL218

HB1500
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-51-716 is amended to read as follows:
26-51-716. Sales of tangible personal property.
Sales of tangible personal property are in this state if:
(a) the property is delivered or shipped to a purchaser within
this state regardless of the f.o.b. point or other conditions of the sale; or
(b) the property is shipped from an office, store, warehouse,
factory, or other place of storage in this state and the taxpayer is not
taxable in the state of the purchaser, in which case the sales shall be
sourced as follows:
(1) For the tax year beginning on January 1, 2024, sales
shall be sourced eighty-five and seventy-one hundredths percent (85.71%)
within this state and fourteen and twenty-nine hundredths percent (14.29%)
outside this state;
(2) For the tax year beginning on January 1, 2025, sales
shall be sourced seventy-one and forty-two hundredths percent (71.42%) within
this state and twenty-eight and fifty-eight hundredths percent (28.58%)
outside this state;
(3) For the tax year beginning on January 1, 2026, sales
shall be sourced fifty-seven and thirteen hundredths percent (57.13%) within
this state and forty-two and eighty-seven hundredths percent (42.87%) outside
this state;
(4) For the tax year beginning on January 1, 2027, sales
shall be sourced forty-two and eighty-four hundredths percent (42.84%) within
this state and fifty-seven and sixteen hundredths percent (57.16%) outside
this state;
(5) For the tax year beginning on January 1, 2028, sales
shall be sourced twenty-eight and fifty-five hundredths percent (28.55%)
within this state and seventy-one and forty-five hundredths percent (71.45%)
outside this state;
(6) For the tax year beginning on January 1, 2029, sales
shall be sourced fourteen and twenty-six hundredths percent (14.26%) within
this state and eighty-five and seventy-four hundredths percent (85.74%)
outside this state; and
(7) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2030,
sales shall be sourced one hundred percent (100%) outside this state.

02/17/2025 11:48:27 AM JLL218

HB1500
SECTION 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.


































02/17/2025 11:48:27 AM JLL218